Idaho, session 2026, H0662.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 37-506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-506. METHOD OF TESTING MILK AND CREAM. (1) All milk and cream pur-
chased or sold in the state of Idaho at a price based upon on or determined
by the milkfat, protein, lactose, solids nonfat, or somatic cell counts
thereof, or by any other quality parameter or other analyte thereof, shall be
tested by methods approved by the director of the department of agriculture
of the state of Idaho.
(2) Samples must be taken from every shipment of milk and cream by a milk
hauler authorized by the department pursuant to chapter 3, title 37, Idaho
Code. Accurate thermometers must be provided at all times. Milk and cream
samples must be protected and in a tamper-proof place between thirty-three
(33) and forty-five (45) degrees Fahrenheit.
(3) Such samples may be examined and tested by the buyer, seller, or de-
partment of agriculture at any time. The department of agriculture is autho-
rized to conduct audits of a person's, corporation's, cooperative's, or com-
pany's payments for milk or cream to determine if such payments comply with
established requirements.
SECTION 2. That Section 37-516, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-516. RULES FOR ADMINISTRATION -- "DEPARTMENT" AND "DIRECTOR" DE-
FINED. (1) As used in this chapter:
(a) "Department" means the Idaho state department of agriculture.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's
authorized designee.
(2) The director of the department of agriculture is empowered to pre-
scribe rules and regulations, subject to legislative approval, in the admin-
istration of this act chapter not inconsistent with its provisions. The term
"department," as used in this act, means the department of agriculture.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.